lib/dict/lv_LV.aff
SFX & Y 13
SFX &  0     âks     [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âka     [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âkas    [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âkam    [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âkai    [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âku     [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âkâ     [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âki     [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âkiem   [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âkâm    [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âkus    [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âkos    [âçîo]t
SFX &  0     âkâs    [âçîo]t

SFX * Y 10
SFX *  0     âkais   [âçîo]t
SFX *  0     âkajam  [âçîo]t
SFX *  0     âkajai  [âçîo]t
SFX *  0     âko     [âçîo]t
SFX *  0     âkajâ   [âçîo]t
SFX *  0     âkie    [âçîo]t
SFX *  0     âkajiem [âçîo]t
SFX *  0     âkajâm  [âçîo]t
SFX *  0     âkajos  [âçîo]t
SFX *  0     âkajâs  [âçîo]t


SFX < Y 13
SFX <  t     joðâks     [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâka     [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâkas    [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâkam    [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâkai    [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâku     [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâkâ     [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâki     [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâkiem   [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâkâm    [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâkus    [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâkos    [âçîo]t
SFX <  t     joðâkâs    [âçîo]t

SFX > Y 10
SFX >  t     joðâkais   [âçîo]t
SFX >  t     joðâkajam  [âçîo]t
SFX >  t     joðâkajai  [âçîo]t
SFX >  t     joðâko     [âçîo]t
SFX >  t     joðâkajâ   [âçîo]t
SFX >  t     joðâkie    [âçîo]t
SFX >  t     joðâkajiem [âçîo]t
SFX >  t     joðâkajâm  [âçîo]t
SFX >  t     joðâkajos  [âçîo]t
SFX >  t     joðâkajâs  [âçîo]t

SFX , Y 13
SFX ,  t     jamâks     [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâka     [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâkas    [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâkam    [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâkai    [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâku     [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâkâ     [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâki     [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâkiem   [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâkâm    [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâkus    [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâkos    [âçîo]t
SFX ,  t     jamâkâs    [âçîo]t

SFX . Y 10
SFX .  t     jamâkais   [âçîo]t
SFX .  t     jamâkajam  [âçîo]t
SFX .  t     jamâkajai  [âçîo]t
SFX .  t     jamâko     [âçîo]t
SFX .  t     jamâkajâ   [âçîo]t
SFX .  t     jamâkie    [âçîo]t
SFX .  t     jamâkajiem [âçîo]t
SFX .  t     jamâkajâm  [âçîo]t
SFX .  t     jamâkajos  [âçîo]t
SFX .  t     jamâkajâs  [âçîo]t


SFX 0 Y 1
SFX 0   0     u     t

SFX J Y 21
SFX J  t   ðana   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ðanas  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ðanai  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ðanu   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ðanâ   [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ðanâs  [^sz]t
SFX J  t   ðanâm  [^sz]t
SFX J  st  ðana   [s]t
SFX J  st  ðanas  [s]t
SFX J  st  ðanai  [s]t
SFX J  st  ðanu   [s]t
SFX J  st  ðanâ   [s]t
SFX J  st  ðanâs  [s]t
SFX J  st  ðanâm  [s]t
SFX J  zt  ðana   [z]t
SFX J  zt  ðanas  [z]t
SFX J  zt  ðanai  [z]t
SFX J  zt  ðanu   [z]t
SFX J  zt  ðanâ   [z]t
SFX J  zt  ðanâs  [z]t
SFX J  zt  ðanâm  [z]t



SFX d Y 16
SFX d   0   ies      t
SFX d   t   ðos      [^sz]t
SFX d   t   sies     [^sz]t
SFX d   t   simies   [^sz]t
SFX d   t   sieties  [^sz]t
SFX d   t   sities   [^sz]t
SFX d   t   îðos     [z]t
SFX d   t   îsies    [z]t
SFX d   t   îsimies  [z]t
SFX d   t   îsieties [z]t
SFX d   t   îsities  [z]t
SFX d   st  tîðos     [s]t
SFX d   st  tîsies    [s]t
SFX d   st  tîsimies  [s]t
SFX d   st  tîsieties [s]t
SFX d   st  tîsities  [s]t


SFX g Y 7
SFX g   t   jos     [âçîoû]t
SFX g   t   jies    [âçîoû]t
SFX g   t   jâs     [âçîoû]t
SFX g   t   jâmies  [âçîoû]t
SFX g   t   jâties  [âçîoû]t
SFX g   0   os      [âçîoû]t
SFX g   t   ðoties  [âçîoû]t


SFX A Y 28
SFX A ties jos      .
SFX A ties jies     .
SFX A ties jas      .
SFX A ties jamies   .
SFX A ties jaties   .
SFX A ties jâs      .
SFX A ties jâmies   .
SFX A ties jâties   .
SFX A ties ðos      .
SFX A ties sies     .
SFX A ties simies   .
SFX A ties sieties  .
SFX A ties sities   .
SFX A ties jieties  .
SFX A ties tos      .
SFX A ties joties   .
SFX A ties ðoties   .
SFX A ties damies   .
SFX A ties damâs    .
SFX A ties joðies   .
SFX A ties joðos    .
SFX A ties joðâs    .
SFX A ties jusies   .
SFX A ties juðies   .
SFX A ties juðos    .
SFX A ties juðâs    .
SFX A ties ðanos    .
SFX A ties ðanâs    .

SFX D Y 50
SFX D âties  os     [â]ties
SFX D âties  ies    [â]ties
SFX D âties  âs     [â]ties
SFX D âties  âmies  [â]ties
SFX D âties  âties  [â]ties
SFX D âties  ieties [â]ties
SFX D âties  oties  [â]ties
SFX D âties  oðies  [â]ties
SFX D âties  oðos   [â]ties
SFX D âties  oðâs   [â]ties
SFX D çties  os     [ç]ties
SFX D çties  ies    [ç]ties
SFX D çties  as     [ç]ties
SFX D çties  amies  [ç]ties
SFX D çties  aties  [ç]ties
SFX D çties  ieties [ç]ties
SFX D çties  oties  [ç]ties
SFX D çties  oðies  [ç]ties
SFX D çties  oðos   [ç]ties
SFX D çties  oðâs   [ç]ties
SFX D îties  os     [î]ties
SFX D îties  ies    [î]ties
SFX D îties  âs     [î]ties
SFX D îties  âmies  [î]ties
SFX D îties  âties  [î]ties
SFX D îties  ieties [î]ties
SFX D îties  oties  [î]ties
SFX D îties  oðies  [î]ties
SFX D îties  oðos   [î]ties
SFX D îties  oðâs   [î]ties
SFX D ies    os      [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   jos     [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   jies    [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   jâs     [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   jâmies  [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   jâties  [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   ðos     [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   sies    [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   sieties [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   simies  [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   sities  [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   damies  [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   damâs   [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   jusies  [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   juðies  [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   juðos   [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   juðâs   [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   ðanos   [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   ðanâs   [âçî]ties
SFX D ties   ðoties  [âçî]ties



SFX T Y 15
SFX T   t   os      [^s]t
SFX T   t   ies     [^s]t
SFX T   t   âs      [^s]t
SFX T   t   âmies   [^s]t
SFX T   t   âties   [^s]t
SFX T   t  os     [^îû][s]t
SFX T   t  ies    [^îû][^s]t
SFX T   t  âs     [^îû][^s]t
SFX T   t  âmies  [^îû][^s]t
SFX T   t  âties  [^îû][^s]t
SFX T   st  dos     [îû][s]t
SFX T   st  dies    [îû][s]t
SFX T   st  dâs     [îû][s]t
SFX T   st  dâmies  [îû][s]t
SFX T   st  dâties  [îû][s]t


SFX R Y 8
SFX R   t  stos     t
SFX R   t  sties    t
SFX R   t  stas     t
SFX R   t  stamies  t
SFX R   t  staties  t
SFX R   t  stieties t
SFX R   t  stoties  t
SFX R   t  ðoties   t









SFX O Y 10
SFX O  s  a   [s]
SFX O  s  am  [s]
SFX O  s  u   [s]
SFX O  s  â   [s]
SFX O  s  0   [s]
SFX O  ð  a    [ð]
SFX O  ð  am   [ð]
SFX O  ð  u    [ð]
SFX O  ð  â    [ð]
SFX O  ð  0    [ð]

SFX i Y 8
SFX i  s  i    [s]
SFX i  s  iem  [s]
SFX i  s  us   [s]
SFX i  s  os   [s]
SFX i  ð  i    [ð]
SFX i  ð  iem  [ð]
SFX i  ð  us   [ð]
SFX i  ð  os   [ð]

SFX t Y 24
SFX t  s   iò    [^gk]s
SFX t  gs  dziò  [g]s
SFX t  ks  ciò   [k]s
SFX t  s   iòð   [^gk]s
SFX t  s   iòa   [^gk]s
SFX t  s   iòam  [^gk]s
SFX t  s   iòu   [^gk]s
SFX t  s   iòâ   [^gk]s
SFX t  gs  dziòð   [g]s
SFX t  gs  dziòa   [g]s
SFX t  gs  dziòam  [g]s
SFX t  gs  dziòu   [g]s
SFX t  gs  dziòâ   [g]s
SFX t  ks  ciòð   [k]s
SFX t  ks  ciòa   [k]s
SFX t  ks  ciòam  [k]s
SFX t  ks  ciòu   [k]s
SFX t  ks  ciòâ   [k]s
SFX t  ð   iòð   [ð]
SFX t  ð   iòa   [ð]
SFX t  ð   iòam  [ð]
SFX t  ð   iòu   [ð]
SFX t  ð   iòâ   [ð]
SFX t  ð   iò    [ð]

SFX v Y 16
SFX v  s   iòi   [^gk]s
SFX v  s   iòus  [^gk]s
SFX v  s   iòiem [^gk]s
SFX v  s   iòos  [^gk]s
SFX v  gs  dziòi   [g]s
SFX v  gs  dziòus  [g]s
SFX v  gs  dziòiem [g]s
SFX v  gs  dziòos  [g]s
SFX v  ks  ciòi     [k]s
SFX v  ks  ciòus    [k]s
SFX v  ks  ciòiem   [k]s
SFX v  ks  ciòos    [k]s
SFX v  ð   iòi     [ð]
SFX v  ð   iòus    [ð]
SFX v  ð   iòiem   [ð]
SFX v  ð   iòos    [ð]

SFX o Y 4
SFX o  0   em   [i]  
SFX o  i   os   [i]
SFX o  i   u    [i]
SFX o  i   us   [i]
