lib/dict/lv_LV.dic
Edgars/Oitv
Ignats/Oitv
Magnuss/Oitv
Roderiks/Oitv
Viríçni/o
aizgrabinâties/+D
aizknikğíinâties/D+
aizspiest/NJ0
aizsâkt/M(+9hJ}TdIB[8]4
aizurbt/JM
aizvicinâties/D+
albumîns/Oi
alusbârs/Oi
angaşçt/+$dB)JIb[1g]HG{Mp
apakğgals/Oitv
apgaiòât/p$+)Jg1IGdbBM{[H]
apgult/+^dBMRIe7Z5[J]
apjoòot/+MI,1Bb)$.HJ
apkaunot/GHgbI+)Bd<>[1J{M$p]
apkniest/MJ0
apkurcuği/o+
aplaizît/(c+J]hBdI1M*b{g&C[
aplauzît/(c+JI]Bhbg1Md{*&[C
apmçtât/+)$bHIdGB{gJM]p[1
aprimt/+ed^JMTIB7]Z[R4
apspiest/JN0
apspîdçt/I+hBC&(Jb*M1
apstatît/h+(B*IJb&MC1
apsukât/.I1g+b)$M]J[p,dGBH{
aptaurçt/I+M$)BJdbGHgp{1[]
aptrûkt/+9ZJI^7RTdB][M4
apvainot/$+<Bd>gHbGI)J1{M.,[p]
apğïukt/B4+0
argumentçt/+$IBJ)bH&*1M
arums/Oitv
asiòot/+Bd)J${bIGg[]M1pH
atbruòot/+Id>$1Bb[J)GM<{gHp]
atgumijot/+b)&$I*BJM1H
atkarâties/A+
atkosts/O
atmelot/d+{$)bGBIHg1p[]
atmâvuği/o+
atpazît/I+dR[^49&MBZJ7]
atriest/M0J
atrist/h+(IMeTF4J
atsmîkòât/+bBIGHg1M$){d[pJ]
atstîvçt/+bGIBgH[1$)MJ]dp{
atvieglot/+)[$Hgb*&]J{.MGpBI,d1
augt/9+MJIdB8Th}(4[]
biedçt/+I$<g1MdBp>)G[bHJ]{
blandîties/D+
brçcçjs/Oi
cûkgans/Oitv
dangains/WiYX
darboties/+A
datorizçt/p$+Ibd]J)&{Bg*[1MGH
dehidratçt/+b)gdIM$G&B*p1[{H]J
dejonizçt/b+I]J$pd[.GB1g)H{M,
dinamisms/O
diskreditçt/,+]J)$MdB.IHGbg{[p1
dobt/B+Id4Te)$6J][Mp
dvest/J0M
fascinçt/I+B>H)$<b1JM
finâlposms/O
frîzs/Oi
godât/gBI$+,.b]JMdpHG)1[{
gremzdi/o
gult/e+IZ^R7dB[5JM]
iebarotâjs/Oix
iebiedçt/+BM&*1IJ$.,b)H
iecienît/$(+1BbIJMH)
iedîdît/B+dIc&(hbg{*J]1MC[
iekabinât/J+1g(b{IBdh}cCM[]
iekarâties/+A
ielavîties/D+
ielçkât/+$bBd)HGJ{M]g1I[p
iesmçrçt/,+.Bdbg$G)J{I]HM1p[
iesvilt/^e+Z7BRITd[4JM]
ievirzît/+Mbh(I1Bc{gJd]C[
ievçrst/0F+
informçt/G)+<b[g>1dI]JBHM${p&*
izbrâzt/6+IdTB2e4][
izbrâíçt/+I1b$BM),.JH
izcirtuği/+o
izdangât/[$+)BdIb&*J]G{1HgpM
izdejot/J+$pdBI1gbM)[{GH,.]
izdomâjums/Oi
izgulçt/hb+gd1BIM*&J]{[
izkağât/+d$gIbJ{)]BH[1pMG
izkağíçties/+A
izkòudinâties/D+
izpumpçt/+IJ$1g&*)dbB[M{.,HGp]
izsacîtâjs/Oix
izsçdçt/+cIgdhb{B&*[J}]1M
iztaisît/J+(bI[{g1hcdMB]C
iztrûkt/4B9+IdT7R^ZJ][M
izzîmçt/H$+d)Mpb{BIgG]J1[*&
izâlçties/A+
izèâpstinâties/D+
jaukums/Oitv
kaist/+e%MJFI74
klikğíinâmâki/o+
knubinât/+bIchC(1gMdB{[J}]
kondominâts/Oi
kopt/)+TdBe$I[]6p4
kristâmtrauks/Oi
kârst/MJ0
laiks/Oitv+
langusts/Oitv
lîdzdarboties/+A
maksimizçt/G$+)b{d[g.J,IBH1M]p
minimizçt/+)1BIgG$MdHb{&*J,.p[]
mobilizçt/GI$+b<>)JdBpMgH{[1]
mucinieks/Oix
mânîtâjs/Oix
nepaspçti/o
noasinât/Jb+h*C(&BI1M
nodegt/(dIT+JB94h8M
nodraiskoties/+A
noeïïot/+IHGbgdB)[$J1M{p]
nogribçties/D+
noklumpaèot/+d1gJ$GbHBIM){][p
nolîst/JN0
noplikğíinât/(+b&*JIhBMC1
nopuòíoties/A+
norimt/+ZIdeT7RBJ]^4M[
nosniegoği/+o
nospiest/+0
nosprostot/$+b)&HJIB*M1
novemstîties/+D
noşagoties/A+
nâvçt/+$[bBIHgJ)Mpd<>{G1]
nîst/+7I%bTJEN[]
orgâns/Oitv
oriìinâls/OitvWYX+
ozonators/Oitv
pabildçt/G+bHgBI)[J$dM{]p1
pabolît/g+(Jb{hc1IBMd][C
padâvât/]J)+{$dIHGbg1B[Mp
pagarinât/bIhJ+*&(1MBC
pagult/IBd+eRJZ^7]5M[
painteresçties/+A
pakârtot/1+BbI,.$H)M&*J
pareizinâjums/Oi
paskaust/N0
paspilgtinât/b+I*(JhMB&C1
pasûkstîties/D+
patopami/o+
patupt/IdJ]+ZR^B[4Te7M
pavçrst/e+ITF
pazemot/+<Bd$>gMI[)bG1HJ{p]
paèâkstçt/+JbCh(IBM1
paíepuroties/A+
pağmakstinât/hJ[+]gIdb(B1cMC{}
piegult/+Zd5^e7BRIJM[]
piejaucçt/+,b.[)MGd$*&IB1pJ]gH{
piemçrot/+dI{)*JMG,[].1g$Bbp&H
pieplivinâties/+D
piespiest/0NJ
pietrûkt/+97RIZMJdT4B^][
pietuvinât/+I(BhCbJ&*M1
piezogoği/o+
planetârs/Wi
prognozçt/B,+M.I$JHb)1
progresçt/$Hb+)><IB1JM
puíupods/Oitv
pârjât/+bd$[I)Gg1B6p]
pârkarâties/+A
pârkârt/+%eTdI}[B6]4
pârpûlçt/c+b{($CBd*)hgI[&HMJ1}]
pârsertificçt/+bI){dBHgG$p]J1[M
pârspiest/JN0
pârtrumpot/+,IB.&b)$1J*MH
pârvads/Oitv
pârvçlçjums/Oi
pârğtancçt/+$)MbJIB1H
pâtari/o
rafinçt/dJ+)BI1G{H$b*gM&[p]
retinilpalmitâts/Oi
rimt/^+eZI7RBTM4d[J]
rosîties/D+
sadraiskoties/+A
sadrupt/+eJIdBT8M4
salaikot/gMb*&+)dH$IB1,G.Jp][{
saliedçt/+G)b.B&{<>I*$H,gM1[dpJ]
saputot/)+d$Hg{bMGIJB1p[]
saskaòot/b+1g[.),dBMJ*$&GHI]{p
sasodît/c+h[b(IBdgJ]1M{C
saspraust/JN0
satvçruği/o+
savietot/.+$*H&)Mgpb]JdIB{G,[1
savilkt/+MdBJ[IT]497
saviïòot/IH*+dBb$<>gG&p)J{M[1]
saèakarçt/G+*p$[b{&)M.HgI1BdJ],
slaists/Oitv
slinkums/Oitv
spîdoğâks/W+i
starpsauciens/Oi
stomîties/+D
strostçt/Ib+$.BH)J1,M
suìestçt/+$I>)Mp[BgJ<1HGbd]{
tinums/Oitv
topâzs/Oitv
trûkt/+97R4BTIJd[MZ]^
uzcerçt/c+(IbJ]hB{gMd1C[}
uzdarboties/+A
uzflirtçt/+Ib)HB$J1M
uzkâst/J0M
uzlçjuği/o+
uzpirkt/M+dI9[J74B]T
uzpleğoğs/+Wi
uzrûkt/dB%9+I6]J5[M
uzskurinât/+&*h(b{cMIBd1g[J]}C
vienot/Id+1gB<)b$JH>[G{p]M
vikonts/Oi
vâvuïot/+bB.IJ[$pd),GMgH1{]
zçns/Oitv
zîmçjums/Oitv
çrmot/H+I*Bd$pJb)Gg{1M&[]
èçrkstçt/+C(JbIBMh1
ûdenssildâms/Wi
